Hawaii statutes.
§302A-123 Board of education; terms.
(a) The governor shall set the terms of the members initially appointed to the
board under section 21 of Act 5, Session Laws of Hawaii 2011, as follows:

(1) Three members shall serve one-year terms;

(2) Three members shall serve two-year terms; and

(3) Three members, including the chairperson, shall
serve three-year terms.

(b) The term of each member shall be three
years, except as provided for in the initial appointment in subsection (a). Notwithstanding
any law to the contrary, members shall serve no more than three consecutive
three-year terms; provided that the members who are initially appointed to
terms of two years or less pursuant to subsection (a) may be reappointed to
three ensuing consecutive three-year terms. If a member is nominated to a
second or subsequent consecutive term, the senate shall consider the question
of whether to reconfirm the member at least one hundred twenty days prior to
the expiration of the member's immediately preceding term; provided that if the
senate has not taken final action to reconfirm the member by the one hundred
twenty-day deadline, the member shall continue to serve until the senate takes
final action on the reconfirmation.

(c) The term of the student representative
shall be one year. The student representative may be selected for one
additional consecutive term; provided that the student representative shall be
a student at the time of selection and shall be a student for the majority of
that term.

(d) Every member may serve beyond the
expiration date of the member's term of appointment until the member's
successor has been appointed by the governor and confirmed by the senate in
accordance with sections 302A-121, 302A-126, and 302A-127. [L 2011, c 5, pt of
§2; am L 2014, c 17, §1]

Attorney General Opinions

This statute, providing that a holdover member shall serve
until a successor has been "appointed by the governor and confirmed by the
senate", is constitutional; the state constitution explicitly grants the legislature
the authority to regulate the board in this manner. Att. Gen. Op. 16-3.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next